Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.814

Expanded eligibility—High school students or students working toward a high school equivalency certificate.

(1) A parent who is attending high school is eligible to receive working connections child care.

(2) A parent age 21 years or younger who is working toward completing a high school equivalency certificate is eligible to receive working connections child care.

(3) When determining consumer eligibility and copayment under this section, the department:

(a) Must, within existing resources, authorize full-day subsidized child care during the school year in cases where:

(i) The parent is participating in 110 hours of approved activities per month;

(ii) The household income of the parent does not exceed 85 percent of the state median income at the time of application; and

(iii) The parent meets all other program eligibility requirements established in this chapter or in rule by the department as authorized by RCW 43.216.055 or 43.216.065 or any other authority granted by this chapter;

(b) May not consider the availability of the other biological parent when authorizing care; and

(c) May not require a copayment.

[ 2024 c 67 s 8; 2020 c 339 s 1. Formerly RCW 43.216.145.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 339 s 1: "Section 1 of this act takes effect September 1, 2020." [ 2020 c 339 s 4.]